test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_lajo_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst


Tests:

  Noun - lajo: # ok LAJO
    lajo+N+Sg+Nom:  lajo
    lajo+N+Sg+Gen:  lajo
    lajo+N+Sg+Acc:  lajo
    lajo+N+Sg+Ill:  lajon
    lajo+N+Sg+Loc:  laajoost
    lajo+N+Sg+Com:  lajoin
    lajo+N+Sg+Abe:  lajottáá
    lajo+N+Ess:  laijoon
    lajo+N+Par: laijood
    lajo+N+Pl+Nom:  lajoh
    lajo+N+Pl+Gen:  lajoi
    lajo+N+Pl+Acc:  lajoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Ill:  lajoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Loc:  lajoin
    lajo+N+Pl+Com:  [lajoiguin, lajoigijn]
    lajo+N+Pl+Abe:  lajoittáá

  Noun - vajo: # ok LAJO
    vajo+N+Sg+Nom:  vajo
    vajo+N+Sg+Gen:  vajo
    vajo+N+Sg+Acc:  vajo
    vajo+N+Sg+Ill:  vajon
    vajo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaajoost
    vajo+N+Sg+Com:  vajoin
    vajo+N+Sg+Abe:  vajottáá
    vajo+N+Ess:  vaijoon
    vajo+N+Par:  vaijood
    vajo+N+Pl+Nom:  vajoh
    vajo+N+Pl+Gen:  vajoi
    vajo+N+Pl+Acc:  vajoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Ill:  vajoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Loc:  vajoin
    vajo+N+Pl+Com:  [vajoiguin, vajoigijn]
    vajo+N+Pl+Abe:  vajoittáá

  Noun - kulo:
    kulo+N+Sg+Nom:  kulo
    kulo+N+Sg+Gen:  kulo
    kulo+N+Sg+Acc:  kulo
    kulo+N+Sg+Ill:  kulon
    kulo+N+Sg+Loc:  kuuloost
    kulo+N+Sg+Com:  kuloin
    kulo+N+Sg+Abe:  kulottáá
    kulo+N+Ess:  kulloon
    kulo+N+Par:  kullood
    kulo+N+Pl+Nom:  kuloh
    kulo+N+Pl+Gen:  kuloi
    kulo+N+Pl+Acc:  kuloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Ill:  kuloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Loc:  kuloin
    kulo+N+Pl+Com:  [kuloiguin, kuloigijn]
    kulo+N+Pl+Abe:  kuloittáá

  Noun - palo: # ? LAJO
    palo+N+Sg+Nom:  palo
    palo+N+Sg+Gen:  palo
    palo+N+Sg+Acc:  palo
    palo+N+Sg+Ill:  palon
    palo+N+Sg+Loc:  paaloost
    palo+N+Sg+Com:  paloin
    palo+N+Sg+Abe:  palottáá
    palo+N+Ess:  palloon
    palo+N+Par:  pallood
    palo+N+Pl+Nom:  paloh
    palo+N+Pl+Gen:  paloi
    palo+N+Pl+Acc:  paloid
    palo+N+Pl+Ill:  paloid
    palo+N+Pl+Loc:  paloin
    palo+N+Pl+Com:  [paloiguin, paloigijn]
    palo+N+Pl+Abe:  paloittáá

  Noun - njamo: # ok LAJO
    njamo+N+Sg+Nom:  njamo
    njamo+N+Sg+Gen:  njamo
    njamo+N+Sg+Acc:  njamo
    njamo+N+Sg+Ill:  njamon
    njamo+N+Sg+Loc:  njaamoost
    njamo+N+Sg+Com:  njamoin
    njamo+N+Sg+Abe:  njamottáá
    njamo+N+Ess:  njammoon
    njamo+N+Par:  njammood
    njamo+N+Pl+Nom:  njamoh
    njamo+N+Pl+Gen:  njamoi
    njamo+N+Pl+Acc:  njamoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Ill:  njamoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Loc:  njamoin
    njamo+N+Pl+Com:  [njamoiguin, njamoigijn]
    njamo+N+Pl+Abe:  njamoittáá

  Noun - ilo:
    ilo+N+Sg+Nom:  ilo
    ilo+N+Sg+Gen:  ilo
    ilo+N+Sg+Acc:  ilo
    ilo+N+Sg+Ill:  ilon
    ilo+N+Sg+Loc:  iiloost
    ilo+N+Sg+Com: iloin
    ilo+N+Sg+Abe:  ilottáá
    ilo+N+Ess:  illoon
    ilo+N+Par:  illood
    ilo+N+Pl+Nom:  iloh
    ilo+N+Pl+Gen:  iloi
    ilo+N+Pl+Acc:  iloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Ill:  iloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Loc:  iloin
    ilo+N+Pl+Com:  [iloiguin, iloigijn]
    ilo+N+Pl+Abe:  iloittáá
    
  Noun - himo:
    himo+N+Sg+Nom:  himo
    himo+N+Sg+Gen:  himo
    himo+N+Sg+Acc:  himo
    himo+N+Sg+Ill:  himon
    himo+N+Sg+Loc:  hiimoost
    himo+N+Sg+Com: himoin
    himo+N+Sg+Abe:  himottáá
    himo+N+Ess:  himmoon
    himo+N+Par:  himmood
    himo+N+Pl+Nom:  himoh
    himo+N+Pl+Gen:  himoi
    himo+N+Pl+Acc:  himoid
    himo+N+Pl+Ill:  himoid
    himo+N+Pl+Loc:  himoin
    himo+N+Pl+Com:  [himoiguin, himoigijn]
    himo+N+Pl+Abe:  himoittáá

  Noun - humo:
    humo+N+Sg+Nom:  humo
    humo+N+Sg+Gen:  humo
    humo+N+Sg+Acc:  humo
    humo+N+Sg+Ill:  humon
    humo+N+Sg+Loc:  huumoost
    humo+N+Sg+Com:  humoin
    humo+N+Sg+Abe:  humottáá
    humo+N+Ess:  hummoon
    humo+N+Par:  hummood
    humo+N+Pl+Nom:  humoh
    humo+N+Pl+Gen:  humoi
    humo+N+Pl+Acc:  humoid
    humo+N+Pl+Ill:  humoid
    humo+N+Pl+Loc:  humoin
    humo+N+Pl+Com:  [humoiguin, humoigijn]
    humo+N+Pl+Abe:  humoittáá
  
  Noun - pino:
    pino+N+Sg+Nom:  pino
    pino+N+Sg+Gen:  pino
    pino+N+Sg+Acc:  pino
    pino+N+Sg+Ill:  pinon
    pino+N+Sg+Loc:  piinoost
    pino+N+Sg+Com:  pinoin
    pino+N+Sg+Abe:  pinottáá
    pino+N+Ess:  pinnoon
    pino+N+Par:  pinnood
    pino+N+Pl+Nom:  pinoh
    pino+N+Pl+Gen:  pinoi
    pino+N+Pl+Acc:  pinoid
    pino+N+Pl+Ill:  pinoid
    pino+N+Pl+Loc:  pinoin
    pino+N+Pl+Com:  [pinoiguin, pinoigijn]
    pino+N+Pl+Abe:  pinoittáá

  Noun - kolo:
    kolo+N+Sg+Nom:  kolo
    kolo+N+Sg+Gen:  kolo
    kolo+N+Sg+Acc:  kolo
    kolo+N+Sg+Ill:  kolon
    kolo+N+Sg+Loc:  kooloost
    kolo+N+Sg+Com:  koloin
    kolo+N+Sg+Abe:  kolottáá
    kolo+N+Ess:  kolloon
    kolo+N+Par:  kollood
    kolo+N+Pl+Nom:  koloh
    kolo+N+Pl+Gen:  koloi
    kolo+N+Pl+Acc:  koloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Ill:  koloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Loc:  koloin
    kolo+N+Pl+Com:  [koloiguin, koloigijn]
    kolo+N+Pl+Abe:  koloittáá

  Noun - sino:
    sino+N+Sg+Nom:  sino
    sino+N+Sg+Gen:  sino
    sino+N+Sg+Acc:  sino
    sino+N+Sg+Ill:  sinon
    sino+N+Sg+Loc:  siinoost
    sino+N+Sg+Com:  sinoin
    sino+N+Sg+Abe:  sinottáá
    sino+N+Ess:  sinnoon
    sino+N+Par:  sinnood
    sino+N+Pl+Nom:  sinoh
    sino+N+Pl+Gen:  sinoi
    sino+N+Pl+Acc:  sinoid
    sino+N+Pl+Ill:  sinoid
    sino+N+Pl+Loc:  sinoin
    sino+N+Pl+Com:  [sinoiguin, sinoigijn]
    sino+N+Pl+Abe:  sinoittáá
 
  Noun - joto:
    joto+N+Sg+Nom:  joto
    joto+N+Sg+Gen:  jođo
    joto+N+Sg+Acc:  jođo
    joto+N+Sg+Ill:  joton
    joto+N+Sg+Loc:  joođoost
    joto+N+Sg+Com:  jođoin
    joto+N+Sg+Abe:  jođottáá
    joto+N+Ess:  jottoon
    joto+N+Par:  jottood
    joto+N+Pl+Nom:  jođoh
    joto+N+Pl+Gen:  jođoi
    joto+N+Pl+Acc:  jođoid
    joto+N+Pl+Ill:  jođoid
    joto+N+Pl+Loc:  jođoin
    joto+N+Pl+Com:  [jođoiguin, jođoigijn]
    joto+N+Pl+Abe:  jođoittáá

  Noun - roto:
    roto+N+Sg+Nom:  roto
    roto+N+Sg+Gen:  rođo
    roto+N+Sg+Acc:  rođo
    roto+N+Sg+Ill:  roton
    roto+N+Sg+Loc:  roođoost
    roto+N+Sg+Com:  rođoin
    roto+N+Sg+Abe:  rođottáá
    roto+N+Ess:  rottoon
    roto+N+Par:  rottood
    roto+N+Pl+Nom:  rođoh
    roto+N+Pl+Gen:  rođoi
    roto+N+Pl+Acc:  rođoid
    roto+N+Pl+Ill:  rođoid
    roto+N+Pl+Loc:  rođoin
    roto+N+Pl+Com:  [rođoiguin, rođoigijn]
    roto+N+Pl+Abe:  rođoittáá

  Noun - kođo:
    kođo+N+Sg+Nom:  kođo
    kođo+N+Sg+Gen:  kođo
    kođo+N+Sg+Acc:  kođo
    kođo+N+Sg+Ill:  kođon
    kođo+N+Sg+Loc:  koođoost
    kođo+N+Sg+Com:  kođoin
    kođo+N+Sg+Abe:  kođottáá
    kođo+N+Ess:  kođđoon
    kođo+N+Par:  kođđood
    kođo+N+Pl+Nom:  kođoh
    kođo+N+Pl+Gen:  kođoi
    kođo+N+Pl+Acc:  kođoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Ill:  kođoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Loc:  kođoin
    kođo+N+Pl+Com:  [kođoiguin, kođoigijn]
    kođo+N+Pl+Abe:  kođoittáá

  Noun - ito:
    ito+N+Sg+Nom:  ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen:  iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc:  iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill:  iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc:  iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com:  iđoin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe:  iđottáá
    ito+N+Ess:  ittoon
    ito+N+Par:  ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom:  iđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen:  iđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc:  iđoid 
    ito+N+Pl+Ill:  iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc:  iđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com:  [iđoiguin, iđoigijn]
    ito+N+Pl+Abe:  iđoittáá

  Noun - ripá: # moved from fadda to the right lexicon
    ripá+N+Sg+Nom:  ripá
    ripá+N+Sg+Gen:  rivá
    ripá+N+Sg+Acc:  rivá
    ripá+N+Sg+Ill:  ripán
    ripá+N+Sg+Loc:  riiváást
    ripá+N+Sg+Com:  riváin
    ripá+N+Sg+Abe:  riváttáá
    ripá+N+Ess:  rippáán
    ripá+N+Par:  rippáád
    ripá+N+Pl+Nom:  riváh
    ripá+N+Pl+Gen:  rivái
    ripá+N+Pl+Acc:  riváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Ill:  riváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Loc:  riváin
    ripá+N+Pl+Com:  [riváiguin, riváigijn]
    ripá+N+Pl+Abe:  riváittáá
